Utah statutes.
72-11-207.    Passenger ropeways -- Registration certificates.
(1)  The committee shall issue to the applying operator registration
certificates for each passenger ropeway owned, managed, or operated by the
operator if:
(a)  the facts stated in the application enable the committee to fulfill its
duties under this chapter; and
(b)  each passenger ropeway to be registered complies with the rules of the
committee  under Section 72-11-210.
(2)  In order to verify that the conditions described in Subsection (1) have
been fulfilled, the committee may make or direct the inspections described in
Section 72-11-211 as necessary.
(3) (a)  When an operator installs a passenger ropeway subsequent to
registration in any year, the operator shall file a supplemental application
for registration of the passenger ropeway.
(b)  Upon  receipt of the supplemental application, the committee shall
immediately initiate proceedings to register or reject registration of the
passenger ropeway under the provisions of this chapter.
(4)  Each registration expires on the date established under Section
72-11-210.
(5) The registration certificate for each passenger ropeway shall be
maintained on file at the area and available to the public for inspection and
copying.
